Missouri, session 2026, SB1122.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Sections 115.013, 115.135, 115.151, 115.155,
115.159, 115.160, 115.449, 115.477, and 115.601, RSMo, are
repealed and ten new sections enacted in lieu thereof, to be
known as sections 9.001, 115.013, 115.135, 115.151, 115.155,
115.159, 115.160, 115.449, 115.477, and 115.601, to read as
follows:
9.001. The first Tuesday after the first Monday in
November of even-numbered years shall be a public holiday.
115.013. As used in this chapter, unless the context
clearly implies otherwise, the following terms mean:
(1) "Air-gap" or "air-gapped", a security measure in
which equipment is physically and technically isolated from
any network [and], is not directly connected to the internet
[nor], is [it] not connected to any other system that is
connected to the internet, and is not capable of connecting
to the internet through bluetooth or any other wireless
technology. Data can only be passed to an air-gapped device
physically via a USB or other removable media;
(2) "Automatic tabulating equipment", the apparatus
necessary to examine and automatically count votes, and the
EXPLANATION-Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in this bill is not enacted
and is intended to be omitted in the law.

SB 1122 2
data processing machines which are used for counting votes
and tabulating results and which are air-gapped and not
physically able to be connected to a network;
(3) "Ballot", the paper ballot, or ballot designed
for use with an electronic voting system on which each voter
may cast all votes to which he or she is entitled at an
election;
(4) "Ballot label", the card, paper, booklet, page, or
other material containing the names of all offices and
candidates and statements of all questions to be voted on;
(5) "Counting location", a location selected by the
election authority for the automatic processing or counting,
or both, of ballots;
(6) "County", any county in this state or any city not
within a county;
(7) "Documentary proof of United States citizenship",
any of the following:
(a) A form of identification issued consistent with
the requirements of the federal REAL ID Act of 2005 that
indicates the applicant is a citizen of the United States;
(b) A valid United States passport;
(c) The applicant's official United States military
identification card, together with a United States military
record of service showing that the applicant's place of
birth was in the United States;
(d) A valid government-issued photo identification
card issued by the federal government or the state of
Missouri showing that the applicant's place of birth was in
the United States;
(e) A valid government-issued photo identification
card issued by the federal government or the state of
Missouri other than that described in paragraphs (a) to (d)

SB 1122 3
of this subdivision, but only if presented together with one
or more of the following:
a. A certified birth certificate issued by a state, a
unit of local government in a state, or a tribal government
which:
(i) Was issued by the state, unit of local government,
or tribal government in which the applicant was born;
(ii) Was filed with the office responsible for keeping
vital records in the state;
(iii) Includes the full name, date of birth, and place
of birth of the applicant;
(iv) Lists the full name of one or both of the parents
of the applicant;
(v) Has the signature of an individual who is
authorized to sign birth certificates on behalf of the
state, unit of local government, or tribal government in
which the applicant was born;
(vi) Includes the date that the certificate was filed
with the office responsible for keeping vital records; and
(vii) Has the seal of the state, unit of local
government, or tribal government that issued the birth
certificate;
b. An extract from a United States hospital record of
birth created at the time of the applicant's birth which
indicates that the applicant's place of birth was in the
United States;
c. A final adoption decree showing the applicant's
name and that the applicant's place of birth was in the
United States;
d. A consular report of birth abroad of a citizen of
the United States or a certification of the applicant's

SB 1122 4
report of birth of a United States citizen issued by the
United States Secretary of State;
e. A naturalization certificate or certificate of
citizenship issued by the United States Secretary of
Homeland Security or any other document or method of proof
of United States citizenship issued by the federal
government pursuant to the federal Immigration and
Nationality Act;
f. An American Indian card issued by the federal
Department of Homeland Security with the classification
"KIC";
(8) "Disqualified", a determination made by a court of
competent jurisdiction, the Missouri ethics commission, an
election authority or any other body authorized by law to
make such a determination that a candidate is ineligible to
hold office or not entitled to be voted on for office;
[(8)] (9) "District", an area within the state or
within a political subdivision of the state from which a
person is elected to represent the area on a policy-making
body with representatives of other areas in the state or
political subdivision;
[(9)] (10) "Electronic voting machine", any part of an
air-gapped electronic voting system on which a voter is able
to cast a ballot under this chapter;
100 [(10)] (11) "Electronic voting system", a system of
101 casting votes by use of marking devices, and counting votes
102 by use of automatic air-gapped tabulating or air-gapped data
103 processing equipment, including computerized voting systems
104 that mark or tabulate ballots;
105 [(11)] (12) "Established political party" for the
106 state, a political party which, at either of the last two
107 general elections, polled for its candidate for any

SB 1122 5
108 statewide office more than two percent of the entire vote
109 cast for the office. "Established political party" for any
110 district or political subdivision shall mean a political
111 party which polled more than two percent of the entire vote
112 cast at either of the last two elections in which the
113 district or political subdivision voted as a unit for the
114 election of officers or representatives to serve its area;
115 [(12)] (13) "Federal office", the office of
116 presidential elector, United States senator, or
117 representative in Congress;
118 [(13)] (14) "Independent", a candidate who is not a
119 candidate of any political party and who is running for an
120 office for which political party candidates may run;
121 [(14)] (15) "Major political party", the political
122 party whose candidates received the highest or second
123 highest number of votes at the last general election;
124 [(15)] (16) "Marking device", any device approved by
125 the secretary of state under section 115.225 which will
126 enable the votes to be counted by automatic tabulating
127 equipment;
128 [(16)] (17) "Municipal" or "municipality", a city,
129 village, or incorporated town of this state;
130 [(17)] (18) "New party", any political group which has
131 filed a valid petition and is entitled to place its list of
132 candidates on the ballot at the next general or special
133 election;
134 [(18)] (19) "Nonpartisan", a candidate who is not a
135 candidate of any political party and who is running for an
136 office for which party candidates may not run;
137 [(19)] (20) "Political party", any established
138 political party and any new party;

SB 1122 6
139 [(20)] (21) "Political subdivision", a county, city,
140 town, village, or township of a township organization county;
141 [(21)] (22) "Polling place", the voting place
142 designated for all voters residing in one or more precincts
143 for any election;
144 [(22)] (23) "Precincts", the geographical areas into
145 which the election authority divides its jurisdiction for
146 the purpose of conducting elections;
147 [(23)] (24) "Public office", any office established by
148 constitution, statute or charter and any employment under
149 the United States, the state of Missouri, or any political
150 subdivision or special district thereof, but does not
151 include any office in the Missouri state defense force or
152 the National Guard or the office of notary public or city
153 attorney in cities of the third classification or cities of
154 the fourth classification;
155 [(24)] (25) "Question", any measure on the ballot
156 which can be voted "YES" or "NO";
157 [(25)] (26) "Relative within the second degree by
158 consanguinity or affinity", a spouse, parent, child,
159 grandparent, brother, sister, grandchild, mother-in-law,
160 father-in-law, daughter-in-law, or son-in-law;
161 [(26)] (27) "Special district", any school district,
162 water district, fire protection district, hospital district,
163 health center, nursing district, or other districts with
164 taxing authority, or other district formed pursuant to the
165 laws of Missouri to provide limited, specific services;
166 [(27)] (28) "Special election", elections called by
167 any school district, water district, fire protection
168 district, or other district formed pursuant to the laws of
169 Missouri to provide limited, specific services; [and

SB 1122 7
170 (28)] (29) "Voting district", the one or more
171 precincts within which all voters vote at a single polling
172 place for any election.
115.135. 1. Any person who is qualified to vote, or
who shall become qualified to vote on or before the day of
election, shall be entitled to register in the jurisdiction
within which he or she resides. In order to vote in any
election for which registration is required, a person must
be registered to vote in the state of Missouri no later than
5:00 p.m., or the normal closing time of any public building
where the registration is being held if such time is later
than 5:00 p.m., on the fourth Wednesday prior to the
election, unless the voter is an interstate former resident,
a new resident, or a covered voter, as defined in section
115.275. Any person registering after such date shall be
eligible to vote in subsequent elections.
2. A person applying to register with an election
authority or a deputy registration official shall identify
himself or herself by presenting [a copy of a birth
certificate, a Native American tribal document, other proof
of United States citizenship, a valid Missouri drivers
license or other form of personal identification]
documentary proof of United States citizenship at the time
of registration. Nothing in this chapter shall require a
person who appears on the list of registered voters or who
seeks to transfer voter registration within this state from
being required to provide an election authority documentary
proof of United States citizenship, unless the person is
stricken from the list of registered voters and the person
thereafter seeks to register to vote.
3. Except as provided in federal law or federal
elections and in section 115.277, no person shall be

SB 1122 8
entitled to vote if the person has not registered to vote in
the jurisdiction of his or her residence.
4. A covered voter as defined in section 115.275 who
has been discharged from military service, has returned from
a military deployment or activation, or has separated from
employment outside the territorial limits of the United
States after the deadline to register to vote, and who is
otherwise qualified to register to vote, may register to
vote in an election in person before the election authority
until 5:00 p.m. on the Friday before such election. Such
persons shall produce sufficient documentation showing
evidence of qualifying for late registration pursuant to
this section.
115.151. 1. Each qualified applicant who appears
before the election authority shall be deemed registered as
of the time the applicant's completed, signed and sworn
registration application is witnessed by the election
authority or deputy registration official.
2. Each applicant who registers by mail shall be
deemed to be registered as of the date the application is
postmarked, if such application is accepted and not rejected
by the election authority [and], the verification notice
required pursuant to section 115.155 is not returned as
undeliverable by the postal service, and documentary proof
of United States citizenship is submitted to the election
authority with the application.
3. Each applicant who registers at a voter
registration agency or the division of motor vehicle and
drivers licensing of the department of revenue shall be
deemed to be registered as of the date the application is
signed by the applicant, if such application is accepted and
not rejected by the election authority and the verification

SB 1122 9
notice required pursuant to section 115.155 is not returned
as undeliverable by the postal service. Voter registration
agencies shall transmit voter registration application forms
to the appropriate election authority not later than five
business days after the form is completed by the applicant.
The division of motor vehicle and drivers licensing of the
department of revenue shall transmit voter registration
application forms to the appropriate election authority not
later than three business days after the form is completed
by the applicant.
115.155. 1. The election authority shall provide for
the registration of each voter. Each application shall be
in substantially the following form:
APPLICATION FOR REGISTRATION
Are you a citizen of the United States?
□ YES □ NO
Will you be 18 years of age on or
before election day?
□ YES □ NO
IF YOU CHECKED “NO” IN RESPONSE TO
EITHER OF THESE QUESTIONS, DO NOT
COMPLETE THIS FORM.
IF YOU ARE SUBMITTING THIS FORM BY MAIL
AND ARE REGISTERING FOR THE FIRST TIME,
PLEASE SUBMIT [A COPY OF A CURRENT,
VALID PHOTO IDENTIFICATION. IF YOU DO
NOT SUBMIT SUCH INFORMATION, YOU WILL
BE REQUIRED TO PRESENT ADDITIONAL
IDENTIFICATION UPON VOTING FOR THE
FIRST TIME SUCH AS A BIRTH CERTIFICATE,
A NATIVE AMERICAN TRIBAL DOCUMENT,

SB 1122 10
OTHER PROOF OF UNITED STATES
CITIZENSHIP, A VALID MISSOURI DRIVER'S
LICENSE OR OTHER FORM OF PERSONAL
IDENTIFICATION] DOCUMENTARY PROOF OF
UNITED STATES CITIZENSHIP.
__________________
Township (or Ward)
__________________ __________________
Name Precinct
__________________ __________________
Home Address Required Personal
Identification
Information
__________________
City ZIP
__________________ __________________
Date of Birth Place of Birth
(Optional)
__________________ __________________
Telephone Number Mother's Maiden
(Optional) Name (Optional)
__________________ __________________
Occupation Last Place
(Optional) Previously

SB 1122 11
Registered
__________________ __________________
Last four digits Under What Name
of Social Security
Number
(Required for
registration
unless no Social
Security Number
exists for
Applicant)
Remarks: __________________
When
Political Party
Affiliation
(OPTIONAL: You
shall be
unaffiliated unless
you designate an
affiliation.)
I am a citizen of the United States and
a resident of the state of Missouri.
I have not been adjudged incapacitated
by any court of law. If I have been
convicted of a felony or of a
misdemeanor connected with the right
of suffrage, I have had the voting
disabilities resulting from such
conviction removed pursuant to law.
I do solemnly swear that all statements
made on this card are true to the
best of my knowledge and belief.

SB 1122 12
I UNDERSTAND THAT IF I REGISTER TO
VOTE KNOWING THAT I AM NOT LEGALLY
ENTITLED TO REGISTER, I AM COMMITTING
A CLASS ONE ELECTION OFFENSE AND
MAY BE PUNISHED BY IMPRISONMENT OF
NOT MORE THAN FIVE YEARS OR BY A
FINE OF BETWEEN TWO THOUSAND FIVE
HUNDRED DOLLARS AND TEN THOUSAND
DOLLARS OR BY BOTH SUCH IMPRISONMENT
AND FINE.
__________________ __________________
Signature of Voter Date
__________________
Signature of Election Official
2. All information required by the voter registration
form in subsection 1 of this section shall be personally
provided by the person seeking to register to vote.
3. The options for political party affiliation
required by the application described in subsection 1 of
this section shall include all established political parties
and an option to be unaffiliated. If an applicant does not
100 designate an affiliation, the election authority shall mark
101 the applicant's form as unaffiliated.
102 [3.] 4. (1) After supplying all information necessary
103 for the registration records, each applicant who appears in
104 person before the election authority shall swear or affirm
105 the statements on the registration application by signing
106 his or her full name, witnessed by the signature of the
107 election authority or such authority's deputy registration
108 official. Each applicant who applies to register by mail

SB 1122 13
109 pursuant to section 115.159, or pursuant to section 115.160
110 or 115.162, shall attest to the statements on the
111 application by his or her signature.
112 (2) Any application for registration shall be
113 accompanied by documentary proof of United States
114 citizenship. The election authority shall reject any
115 application for registration that is not accompanied by
116 documentary proof of United States citizenship. The
117 election authority shall notify the applicant within ten
118 business days of receipt of the registration form if the
119 application was not accompanied by documentary proof of
120 United States citizenship. The notice shall state that the
121 registration cannot be completed until documentary proof of
122 United States citizenship is supplied. If the documentary
123 proof of United States citizenship is supplied before 7:00
124 p.m. on election day, that person is deemed to have been
125 registered on the date the registration was first received.
126 [4.] 5. Upon receipt by mail of a completed and signed
127 voter registration application, a voter registration
128 application forwarded by the division of motor vehicle and
129 drivers licensing of the department of revenue pursuant to
130 section 115.160, or a voter registration agency pursuant to
131 section 115.162, the election authority shall, if satisfied
132 that the applicant is entitled to register, transfer all
133 data necessary for the registration records from the
134 application to its registration system. Within seven
135 business days after receiving the application, the election
136 authority shall send the applicant a verification notice.
137 If such notice is returned as undeliverable by the postal
138 service within the time established by the election
139 authority, the election authority shall not place the
140 applicant's name on the voter registration file.

SB 1122 14
141 [5.] 6. If, upon receipt by mail of a voter
142 registration application or a voter registration application
143 forwarded pursuant to section 115.160 or 115.162, the
144 election authority determines that the applicant is not
145 entitled to register, such authority shall, within seven
146 business days after receiving the application, so notify the
147 applicant by mail and state the reason such authority has
148 determined the applicant is not qualified. The applicant
149 may file a complaint with the elections division of the
150 secretary of state's office under and pursuant to section
151 115.219. If an applicant for voter registration fails to
152 answer the question on the application concerning United
153 States citizenship, the election authority shall notify the
154 applicant of the failure and provide the applicant with an
155 opportunity to complete the form in a timely manner to allow
156 for the completion of the registration form before the next
157 election.
158 [6.] 7. The secretary of state shall prescribe
159 specifications for voter registration documents so that they
160 are uniform throughout the state of Missouri and comply with
161 the National Voter Registration Act of 1993, including the
162 reporting requirements, and so that registrations, name
163 changes and transfers of registrations within the state may
164 take place as allowed by law.
165 [7.] 8. All voter registration applications shall be
166 preserved in the office of the election authority.
115.159. [1.] Any person who is qualified to register
in Missouri shall, upon application and submission to the
election authority of documentary proof of United States
citizenship, be entitled to register by mail. Upon request,
application forms shall be furnished by the election
authority or the secretary of state.

SB 1122 15
[2. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the
contrary, the election authority shall not deliver any
absentee ballot to any person who registers to vote by mail
until after such person has:
(1) Voted, in person, after presentation of a proper
form of identification set out in section 115.427, for the
first time following registration; or
(2) Provided a copy of identification set out in
section 115.427 to the election authority.
This subsection shall not apply to those persons identified
in section 115.283 who are exempted from obtaining a notary
seal or signature on their absentee ballots. An individual
who has registered to vote by mail but who does not meet the
requirements of this subsection may cast a provisional
ballot by mail. Such ballot shall not be counted pursuant
to this chapter, and the individual shall be notified of the
reason for not counting the ballot.
3. Subsection 2 of this section shall not apply in the
case of a person:
(1) Who registers to vote by mail pursuant to Section
6 of the National Voter Registration Act of 1993 and submits
a copy of a current and valid photo identification as part
of such registration;
(2) Who registers to vote by mail pursuant to Section
6 of the National Voter Registration Act of 1993 and:
(a) Submits with such registration either a driver's
license number, or at least the last four digits of the
individual's Social Security number; and
(b) With respect to whom the secretary of state
matches the information submitted pursuant to paragraph (a)
of this subdivision with an existing state identification

SB 1122 16
record bearing the same number, name, and date of birth as
provided in such registration;
(3) Who is:
(a) A covered voter defined in section 115.902;
(b) Provided the right to vote otherwise than in
person pursuant to Section 3(b)(2)(B)(ii) of the Voting
Accessibility for the Elderly and Handicapped Act; or
(c) Entitled to vote otherwise than in person pursuant
to any other federal law.]
115.160. 1. All Missouri driver's license applicants
shall receive a voter registration application form as a
simultaneous part of the application for a driver's license,
renewal of driver's license, change of address, duplicate
request and a nondriver's license.
2. If a single application form is used, the voter
registration application portion of any application
described in subsection 1 of this section may not require
any information that duplicates information required in the
driver's license portion of the form, except a second
signature or other information required by law.
3. After conferring with the secretary of state as the
chief state election official responsible for overseeing of
the voter registration process, the director of revenue
shall adopt rules and regulations pertaining to the format
of the voter registration application used by the
department. The director of revenue shall utilize
electronic voter registration application forms and provide
for secure electronic transfer of voter registration
information to election authorities. The secretary of state
and the director of revenue shall ensure the confidentiality
and integrity of the voter registration data collected,
maintained, received, or transmitted under this section.

SB 1122 17
4. No information relating to the failure of an
applicant for a driver's license or nondriver's license to
sign a voter registration application may be used for any
purpose other than voter registration.
5. Any voter registration application received
pursuant to the provisions of this section shall be
forwarded, in a secure and electronic manner, to the
election authority located within that county or any city
not within a county, or if there is more than one election
authority within the county, then to the election authority
located nearest to the location where the driver's license
application was received. Voter registration information,
including an electronic image of the signature of the
applicant, shall be transmitted in a format compatible with
the Missouri voter registration system established in
section 115.158 which allows for review by the election
authority and does not require the election authority to
manually reenter the information, provided that the election
authority shall print out a paper copy of the information
and retain such information in the manner required by
section 115.145. The election authority receiving the
application forms shall review the applications and forward,
in a secure and electronic manner, any applications
pertaining to a different election authority to that
election authority.
6. A completed voter registration application accepted
in the driver's licensing process shall be transmitted to
the election authority described in subsection 5 of this
section not later than three business days after the form is
completed by the applicant.
7. Any person registering to vote when applying for or
renewing a Missouri driver's license shall submit with the

SB 1122 18
application form [a copy of a birth certificate, a Native
American tribal document, or other proof of United States
citizenship, a valid Missouri driver's license, or other
form of personal identification] documentary proof of United
States citizenship. Any person who, at the time of a
transaction with the division of motor vehicle and driver
licensing of the department of revenue, provides a document
that establishes noncitizenship shall not be offered the
opportunity to register to vote as part of the transaction.
115.449. 1. As soon as the polls close in each
polling place using paper ballots, the election judges shall
begin to count the votes. If earlier counting is begun
pursuant to section 115.451, the election judges shall
complete the count in the manner provided by this section.
Once begun, no count shall be adjourned or postponed until
all proper votes have been counted. Notwithstanding any
provision of law to the contrary, all counting of ballots
under this section shall be recorded and streamed
electronically on the website of the respective election
authority.
2. One counting judge, closely observed by the other
counting judge, shall take the ballots out of the ballot box
one at a time and, holding each ballot in such a way that
the other counting judge may read it, shall read the name of
each candidate properly voted for and the office sought by
each. As each vote is called out, the recording judges
shall each record the vote on a tally sheet. The votes for
and against all questions shall likewise be read and
recorded. If more than one political subdivision or special
district is holding an election on the same day at the same
polling place and using separate ballots, the counting
judges may separate the ballots of each political

SB 1122 19
subdivision and special district and first read one set,
then the next and so on until all proper votes have been
counted.
3. After the recording of all proper votes, the
recording judges shall compare their tallies. When the
recording judges agree on the count, they shall sign both of
the tally sheets, and one of the recording judges shall
announce in a loud voice the total number of votes for each
candidate and for and against each question.
4. After the announcement of the vote, the election
judges shall record the vote totals in the appropriate
places on each statement of returns. If any tally sheet or
statement of returns contains no heading for any question,
the election judges shall write the necessary headings on
the tally sheet or statement of returns.
115.477. 1. In each jurisdiction using an electronic
voting system, all proceedings at the counting location
shall be under the direction of the election authority. The
election authority shall appoint two judges, one from each
major political party, to be present and observe the count.
The counting shall be open to the public, but no persons,
except those employed and authorized for the purpose, shall
touch any ballot, ballot container or return.
Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, all
counting of ballots under this section shall be recorded and
streamed electronically on the website of the respective
election authority.
2. The automatic tabulating equipment shall produce a
return showing the total number of votes cast for each
candidate and on each question at each polling place and in
the jurisdiction as a whole.

SB 1122 20
3. If any ballot is damaged and cannot be properly
counted by the automatic tabulating equipment, it may be
handcounted in the manner provided for absentee ballots, or
a true duplicate copy may be made of the defective ballot.
If any ballot contains a number of votes and write-in votes
for any office which exceeds the number allowed by law, it
may be handcounted in the manner provided for absentee
ballots, a true duplicate copy be made which does not
include the invalid votes or, at the discretion of the
election judges, a self-adhesive removable label,
sensitized, may be placed over any mark to allow the ballot
to be processed through the automatic tabulating equipment.
The duplication of each ballot shall be closely observed by
two election judges or employees of the election authority,
one from each major political party. Each duplicate ballot
shall be clearly labeled "duplicate", shall bear a serial
number which shall be recorded on the defective ballot, and
shall be counted in lieu of the defective ballot.
115.601. 1. Any contestant in a primary or other
election contest who was defeated by less than one percent
of the votes cast for the office and any contestant who
received the second highest number of votes cast for that
office if two or more are to be elected and who was defeated
by less than one percent of the votes cast, or any person
whose position on a question was defeated by less than one
percent of the votes cast on the question, shall have the
right to a recount of the votes cast for the office or on
the question.
2. In cases where the candidate filed or the ballot
question was originally filed with an election authority as
defined in section 115.015, such recount shall be requested
in accordance with the provisions of section 115.531 or

SB 1122 21
115.577 and conducted under the direction of the court or
the commissioner representing the court trying the contest
according to the provisions of this subchapter.
3. In cases where the candidate filed or the ballot
question was originally filed with the secretary of state,
the defeated candidate or the person whose position on a
question was defeated by less than one-half of one percent
of the votes cast on the question shall be allowed a recount
pursuant to this section by filing with the secretary of
state a request for a recount stating that the person or the
person's position on a question was defeated by less than
one-half of one percent of the votes cast. Such request
shall be filed not later than seven days after certification
of the election. The secretary of state shall notify all
concerned parties of the filing of the request for a
recount. The secretary of state shall authorize the
election authorities to conduct a recount pursuant to this
section if the requesting party or his position on a
question was defeated by less than one-half of one percent
of the votes cast. The secretary of state shall conduct and
certify the results of the recount as the official results
in the election within twenty days of receipt of the
aforementioned notice of recount.
4. Whenever a recount is requested pursuant to
subsection 3 of this section, the secretary of state shall
determine the number of persons necessary to assist with the
recount and shall appoint such persons equally from lists
submitted by the contestant and the opponent who received
more votes or a person whose position on a question received
more votes than the contestant's position on that question.
Each person appointed pursuant to this section shall be a
disinterested person and a registered voter of the area in

SB 1122 22
which the contested election was held. Each person so
appointed shall take the oath prescribed for and receive the
same pay as an election judge in the jurisdiction where the
person is registered. After being sworn not to disclose any
facts uncovered by the recount, except those which are
contained in the report, the contestant and the opponent who
received more votes or a person whose position on a question
received more votes than the contestant's position on that
question shall be permitted to be present in person or
represented by an attorney at the recount and to observe the
recount. Each recount shall be completed under the
supervision of the secretary of state with the assistance of
the election authorities involved, and the persons appointed
to assist with the recount shall perform such duties as the
secretary of state directs. Upon completion of any duties
prescribed by the secretary of state the persons appointed
to assist with the recount shall make a written and signed
report of their findings. The findings of the persons
appointed to assist with the recount shall be prima facie
evidence of the facts stated therein, but any person present
at the examination of the votes may be a witness to
contradict the findings. No one other than the secretary of
state, the election authorities involved, the contestant and
the other witnesses described in this subsection, their
attorneys, and those specifically appointed by the secretary
of state to assist with the recount shall be present during
any recount conducted pursuant to this section.
5. In any election decided by less than five hundred
votes, each election authority whose office has jurisdiction
over the election being conducted shall conduct a recount
consistent with the provisions applicable to recounts
requested pursuant to subsection 3 of this section.

SB 1122 23
6. For purposes of this section, "recount" means one
additional counting of all votes counted for the office or
on the question with respect to which the recount is
requested.
✓